Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Standing Joint Congressional Redistricting Committee

§ 5-3-121.
Standing joint congressional redistricting committee; membership and organization.

There is hereby created a standing joint congressional redistricting committee, to be composed of the chairman and vice chairman of the apportionment and elections committee of the house of representatives and the chairman and vice chairman of the elections committee of the senate; ten (10) members of the house of representatives, two (2) from each congressional district, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and ten (10) members of the senate, two (2) from each congressional district, to be appointed by the lieutenant governor. In the event the congressional districts of the state shall change numerically, then the number appointed from the senate and from the house from congressional districts shall be adjusted accordingly. The members shall serve until the end of the term of office for which such member has been elected.

The lieutenant governor and speaker of the house of representatives shall call an organizational meeting of the committee and the committee shall elect a chairman and such other officers as they deem necessary. A majority vote of the members of each house shall be required on all votes by the committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 302, § 1 subd (1), eff from and after passage (approved January 30, 1981).

§ 5-3-123.
Preparation of plan to redistrict congressional districts.

The members of the committee shall draw a plan to redistrict, according to constitutional standards, the United States congressional districts for the state of Mississippi no later than thirty (30) days preceding the convening of the next regular session of the legislature after the results of the 1980 decennial census are published and every ten (10) years thereafter.

Provided, however, the committee shall not be required to present a plan to the governor and to the legislature prior to four (4) months after the publication of census data.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 302, § 1 subd (2), eff from and after passage (approved January 30, 1981).

§ 5-3-125.
Per diem compensation; reimbursement for expenses and mileage.

The members of the committee shall be entitled to receive compensation as follows:

Per diem compensation for each day engaged in the discharge of official duties at the same rate as compensated during a special session of the Legislature and reimbursement for all actual, necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties, including mileage as authorized by law; or

Per diem compensation for each day engaged in the discharge of official duties in the amount authorized by Section 25-3-69 and a mileage allowance and an expense allowance in the amount authorized by Section 5-1-47.

Prior to receiving any compensation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a member of the committee shall give notice in writing to the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of Representatives, as the case may be, of the manner in which he desires to be compensated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

No compensation shall be paid pursuant to this section for attending meetings of the committee while the Legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 302, § 1 subd (3); Laws, 2001, ch. 504, § 3, eff from and after May 9, 2001 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-3-127.
Cooperation with other state agencies; employment of experts; other employees.

All political subdivisions, state agencies, and all other creatures of the state of Mississippi are hereby authorized and directed to assist the committee and to provide it with such professional, technical and other expertise as each may possess when requested so to do. After an affirmative finding that professional, technical or other expertise is needed that cannot be provided by the aforesaid political subdivisions, state agencies, and other creatures of the state, then the committee may employ or contract for such professional, technical or other expertise necessary to accomplish the apportionment. The committee may employ staff personnel as it deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 302, § 1 subd (4), eff from and after passage (approved January 30, 1981).

§ 5-3-129.
Submission of plan to governor and legislature.

Upon completion of a redistricting plan, the committee shall present its plan to the governor and to the Mississippi legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 302, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved January 30, 1981).